Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2728.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 24-12-37 of the General Laws in Chapter 24-12 entitled "Rhode
Island Turnpike and Bridge Authority" is hereby amended to read as follows:
24-12-37. Penalty for nonpayment of toll — Toll violators and toll evaders.
(a) Legislative findings. The general assembly finds as follows:
(1) That all users of any tolled projects should be required to timely pay for the use of such
projects;
(2) That toll violators and toll evaders unfairly shift the financial burden of maintaining the
tolled projects to other project users; and
(3) Rhode Island has a strong interest in ensuring that its transportation infrastructure is
adequately funded in a fair and equitable manner; and
(4) That toll collection and enforcement systems should align with consumer protection
values and best practices, including proportional penalties, clear notice, and reasonable
opportunities for resolution.
(b) In each instance when a person fails or refuses to pay or prepay the required toll on a
tolled project, and is issued a violation for the same, the toll violator shall pay the toll amount within
fourteen (14) days of issuance of the violation.
(c) Any toll violator who fails to pay the toll amount due within the fourteen-day (14)
period in subsection (b) shall immediately incur a forty-dollar ($40.00) administrative fee in
addition to the unpaid toll amount.

(d) Any toll violator who fails to pay the administrative fee and unpaid toll as required by
subsection (c) within forty-five (45) days of the issuance of the original violation, shall incur a
thirty five-dollar ($35.00) administrative fee in addition to the forty dollar ($40.00) administrative
fee and the unpaid toll amount. The toll amount and administrative fees shall be paid to the
authority.
(e) Toll evaders shall be responsible for any tolls and administrative fees applicable to toll
violators. Further, at the request of the authority, any toll evader shall also promptly receive a traffic
violation summons that shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the Rhode Island traffic tribunal,
which may suspend the toll evader’s driver’s license for up to six (6) months for the violations and
assess a fine of up to five hundred dollars ($500), or both. All tolls, administrative fees, and fines
shall be payable to the authority.
(f)(1) If any unpaid toll amounts, administrative fees, and fines are not paid within ninety
(90) days of the issuance of the original violation, and the toll violator has incurred at least ten (10)
instances in which such toll violator has failed to pay any required toll amounts, administrative
fees, and fines, then the authority may report the person as a toll violator, or, if appropriate, as a
toll evader, to the Rhode Island division of motor vehicles, who then shall not permit that person
to renew his or her driver’s license and vehicle registration until any unpaid toll amounts,
administrative fees, and fines are paid to the authority. Upon the authority’s receipt of such payment
or a written repayment agreement between the person and the authority, the authority shall promptly
issue a verbal, written, or electric confirmation showing the amounts paid and a certification that
the person does not owe any amounts to the authority or has otherwise made satisfactory repayment
arrangements with the authority. In any such case, the Rhode Island division of motor vehicles shall
forthwith release any hold placed for this purpose on the person’s license renewal and vehicle
registration renewal. If a person who made satisfactory repayment arrangements with the authority
subsequently fails to honor and comply with such arrangements with the authority according to
their terms, the authority may re-report the person to the Rhode Island division of motor vehicles
which shall then prohibit that person from renewing their driver’s license and vehicle registration
until the originally unpaid toll amounts, administrative fees, and fines are paid to the authority.
(2) Prior to reporting any toll violator or toll evader to the Rhode Island division of motor
vehicles, and if the toll violator or toll evader is an E-ZPass account holder with the authority who
has an electronic mailing address on file with the authority, the authority or its agent shall send a
notice to the violator via electronic mail to the electronic mailing address on file, or if no electronic
mailing address is on file or electronic notice cannot be successfully delivered, by first-class mail
through the United States Postal Service to the most recent mailing address on file, when the
LC005122 - Page 2 of 6

following occurs:
(1) The prepaid toll account balance has fallen below the minimum required amount; and
(2) The prepaid toll account balance reflects a negative balance.
(g) “Toll violator” means, for the purposes of this section, any person who uses any project
and fails to pay or prepay the required toll.
(h) “Toll evader” means, for the purposes of this section, any person who uses a project,
fails or refuses to pay or prepay the required toll, and deliberately circumvents or proceeds around
or through a gate or other barrier on a project; and/or any toll violator who fails or refuses to pay
or prepay the required toll on a tolled project at least twenty (20) or more times, received at least
three (3) written notices from the authority (or its agent) regarding the non-payment of tolls, and is
not a party to, or in current compliance with, a written repayment plan with the authority.
(i) The authority may promulgate appropriate rules and regulations to ensure the proper
administration of the provisions of this section. Any person aggrieved by the authority’s assessment
of any administrative fees may request review of such assessment through the process established
by the authority, which shall not be subject to the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42.
(j) For the purposes of this section only, “person” means the registered owner, EZPass
account holder, driver, rentee, or lessee of a motor vehicle.
(k) This section shall apply retroactively to all persons who are toll evaders as of the
effective date of this act [October 1, 2016].
(l) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to reduce or otherwise eliminate
any tolls, fines, or penalties a person owes to the authority based upon violations occurring prior to
the effective date of this act [October 1, 2016].
(m) It is unlawful for any person or business, other than an authorized representative of the
authority, or any other duly authorized and existing toll or transportation agency, to sell, lease, rent,
or offer for sale, lease or rent, any tokens, tickets, passes, transponders, or other evidences of
payment issued for passage on any project. Any person or business who or that is found in violation
of this subsection shall be punished, for each offense, by a fine of not more than five hundred
dollars ($500).
(n) If any provision of this section or its application to any person is deemed invalid, any
such invalidity shall not affect the other provisions of this section that may lawfully be given effect
without the invalid provision.
SECTION 2. Chapter 24-12 of the General Laws entitled "Rhode Island Turnpike and
Bridge Authority" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
24-12-37.3. Rules and regulations governing transponder failure -- Proactive
LC005122 - Page 3 of 6

customer outreach -- Notice infrastructure -- Toll and penalty mitigation.
(a) The authority shall, pursuant to the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42 ("administrative
procedures"), promulgate rules and regulations establishing a comprehensive framework to address
the known and foreseeable failure of E-ZPass transponders including, but not limited to, battery
end-of-life failure, signal degradation, and other equipment malfunctions.
(b) The rules and regulations required under this section shall expressly account for
circumstances in which the authority knew or reasonably should have known that a class, model,
or generation of transponders was subject to elevated or systemic failure rates, and shall not be
limited solely to instances in which the authority has identified a specific malfunctioning
transponder associated with an individual account.
(c) The rules and regulations shall require the authority to implement a proactive customer
outreach and education program to notify account holders of the general risk of transponder battery
failure and equipment malfunction.
(d) The outreach and education program established by rule or regulation shall include, at
a minimum:
(1) Periodic electronic and written communications to account holders describing the
expected lifespan of transponder batteries, known failure risks, warning indicators, and steps
customers may take to verify proper operation;
(2) Prominent and recurring notices on the authority’s website, customer account portals,
and any mobile applications;
(3) Targeted outreach to customers using transponders identified by the authority as part
of a population experiencing elevated failure rates;
(4) Clear procedures for testing, replacement, or repair of transponders, without charge,
when failure is attributable to normal battery depletion or equipment defect; and
(5) Proactive efforts to collect and maintain current electronic mail addresses for all E-
ZPass account holders for purposes of account and equipment notifications, including prompts
during account creation, renewal, customer service interactions, and online account access.
(e) The rules and regulations shall require the authority to establish and follow a written
process for providing notice by first-class mail through the United States Postal Service when:
(1) An account holder has not provided an electronic mail address;
(2) An electronic notice is returned as undeliverable; or
(3) The authority otherwise lacks reasonable assurance that electronic notice has been
received.
(f) The rules and regulations shall prohibit reliance on toll violations, accumulated unpaid
LC005122 - Page 4 of 6

tolls, or enforcement actions as the primary or initial mechanism for identifying transponder failure.
(g) The rules and regulations shall establish a standardized, transparent, and uniform
process for the review, mitigation, and forgiveness of tolls, administrative fees, fines, and penalties
that result from transponder failure or malfunction, including battery depletion, where the account
holder did not receive reasonable or timely notice of the failure risk.
(h) The mitigation and forgiveness process established by rule or regulation shall:
(1) Be applied consistently and not on an ad hoc or discretionary basis;
(2) Authorize the waiver, reduction, or refund of excessive toll charges, fees, and penalties
attributable to transponder failure;
(3) Permit retroactive relief for violations incurred during periods in which the authority
knew or reasonably should have known of widespread or systemic transponder failures; and
(4) Be clearly communicated to customers as part of the outreach program required under
subsection (c) of this section.
(i) The authority shall publish the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this section
and shall submit an annual report to the general assembly detailing:
(1) Transponder failure trends and impacts;
(2) Outreach and notice efforts undertaken, including electronic and postal
communications;
(3) The number and aggregate dollar amount of tolls, fees, and penalties waived, reduced,
or refunded; and
(4) Measures taken to prevent future systemic equipment failures.
(j) Nothing in this section shall be construed to eliminate liability for valid tolls; provided,
however, that the authority shall prioritize fairness, transparency, and consumer protection in
administering toll enforcement when violations arise from equipment failures beyond the
reasonable control of the account holder.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005122
========
LC005122 - Page 5 of 6